Washington statutes.
RCW 35.91.010

Declaration of purpose—Short title.

The improvement of public health and the implementation of both urban and rural development being furthered by adequate and comprehensive water facilities and storm and sanitary sewer systems, and there being a need for legislation enabling such aids to the welfare of the state, there is hereby enacted the "municipal water and sewer facilities act."

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.91.010. Prior: 1959 c 261 s 1.]